North Dakota, session 69, HB1527.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Holocaust education .
1. In this section:
a. "Antisemitism" has the same meaning as the working definition of antisemitism
adopted by the international holocaust remembrance alliance on May 26, 2016,
including contemporary examples of antisemitism and incorporated by reference
in presidential executive order number 13899, published on December 11, 2019.
b. "Holocaust" means the systematic, bureaucratic, state-sponsored persecution
and murder of approximately six million Jews by the Third Reich and its allies and
collaborators during World War II.
2. The world history course under section 15.1 - 21 - 02 must include the following :
a. Causes and ramifications of the Holocaust;
b. History of antisemitism and the Holocaust, including the Third Reich dictatorship,
concentration camp system, persecution of Jews and non-Jews, Jewish and
non - Jewish resistance, and post-World War II trials ;
c. Impact of personal responsibility, civic engagement, and societal response in the
context of the Holocaust;
Page No. 1 25.0766.05000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
d. Connection between national, ethnic, racial, and religious intolerance and the
subjects described in subdivisions a and b ;
e. Leading role played by the United States and the armed forces of the United
States; and
f. Definition, history, response, and actions taken in the face of the Holocaust.
Page No. 2 25.0766.05000